Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1402.01
Acquiring carrier, defined.

Acquiring carrier means a business entity which acquires by purchase, lease, or otherwise a light-density rail line, except carriers acquiring an abandoned rail line, with the intent of operating the light-density rail line for the purpose of continuing the commercial transportation of goods or passengers over the light-density rail line.

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 463, § 3.